Utah statutes.
7-2-13.   Collections in liquidation -- Deposit -- Preference.
The moneys collected in process of a liquidation by the commissioner shall be
from time to time deposited, subject to his order as herein provided, in one
or more federally insured depository institutions organized under the laws of
this state. In case of the suspension or insolvency of the depository
institution, these deposits shall be preferred before all other deposits.
